Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [326B.161] FEES WAIVED FOR RESIDENTIAL IMPROVEMENT FOR VETERAN WITH A DISABILITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Disability" means a physical or mental impairment of a veteran that receives a disability rating under United States Code, title 38. new text end new text begin (c) "Municipality" means a county, statutory or home rule charter city, or town. new text end new text begin (d) "Residential improvement" means a remodel, renovation, or other improvement to a residential property that requires a license, building permit, inspection, or other approval by a municipality. new text end new text begin (e) "Veteran" has the meaning given in section 197.447. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Municipal fees waived; veterans with a disability. new text end new text begin A municipality may not charge a fee under section 326B.148, 326B.151, 326B.153, 326B.154, 326B.184, 326B.37, 326B.49, 326B.92, 326B.986, or 462.353 or any other law or rule authorizing the imposition of a fee by a municipality for a residential improvement that is required to accommodate the disability of a veteran who resides on the property. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Nonpayment of fee. new text end new text begin A municipality is prohibited from refusing to issue a license, building permit, or other approval or conduct an inspection or other necessary activity for a residential improvement required to accommodate the disability of a veteran due to the nonpayment of an associated fee. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application; proof of veteran status required. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section relieves an individual from a requirement to complete and submit an application, a form, or other documentation to obtain a license, building permit, or other approval or for the completion of an inspection or other activity necessary for a residential improvement. new text end new text begin (b) A veteran must provide proof of veteran status and attest in the form and manner required by the municipality that a residential remodel or renovation is required to accommodate the veteran's disability. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end